Illinois, session 104th, HB2469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Film Production Services Tax Credit Act of 52008 is amended by adding Section 51 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 16/51 new)7    Sec. 51. Illinois Film Office logo. Notwithstanding any 8other provision of law, an accredited production receiving 9credits under this Act on or after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly must (i) include 11in the credits of the accredited production the official logo 12of the Illinois Film Office and (ii) include an Internet link 13to the website of the Illinois Film Office on any promotional 14website for the accredited production.